Illinois, session 104th, SB1667.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 3. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 14a as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/14a)  (from Ch. 127, par. 150a)7    Sec. 14a. Payments for unused benefits; use of sick leave. 8    (a) Upon the death of a State employee, his or her estate 9is entitled to receive from the appropriation for personal 10services available for payment of his or her compensation such 11sum for accrued vacation period, accrued overtime, and accrued 12qualifying sick leave as would have been paid or allowed to 13such employee had he or she survived and terminated his or her 14employment.15    Except as provided in the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 16Property Act, the The State Comptroller shall draw a warrant 17or warrants against the appropriation, upon receipt of a 18proper death certificate, payable to decedent's estate, or if 19no estate is opened, to the person or persons entitled thereto 20under Section 25-1 of the Probate Act of 1975 upon receipt of 21the affidavit referred to in that Section, for the sum due. 22Funds owed to the estate or heirs of a deceased State employee 23pursuant to this Section that are not paid within one year of   SB1667 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1the State employee's death shall be reported and remitted to 2the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 3Property Act. 4    (b) The Department of Central Management Services shall 5prescribe by rule the method of computing the accrued vacation 6period and accrued overtime for all employees, including those 7not otherwise subject to its jurisdiction, and for the 8purposes of this Act the Department of Central Management 9Services may require such reports as it deems necessary. 10Accrued sick leave shall be computed as provided in subsection 11(f). 12    (c) Unless otherwise provided for in a collective 13bargaining agreement entered into under the Illinois 14Educational Labor Relations Act, upon the retirement or 15resignation of a State employee from State service, his or her 16accrued vacation, overtime, and qualifying sick leave shall be 17payable to the employee in a single lump sum payment. However, 18if the employee returns to employment in any capacity with the 19same agency or department within 30 days of the termination of 20his or her previous State employment, the employee must, as a 21condition of his or her new State employment, repay the lump 22sum amount within 30 days after his or her new State employment 23commences. The amount repaid shall be deposited into the fund 24from which the payment was made or the General Revenue Fund, 25and the accrued vacation, overtime and sick leave upon which 26the lump sum payment was based shall be credited to the account   SB1667 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1of the employee in accordance with the rules of the 2jurisdiction under which he or she is employed.3    (d) Upon the movement of a State employee from a position 4subject to the Personnel Code to another State position not 5subject to the Personnel Code, or to a position subject to the 6Personnel Code from a State position not subject to the 7Personnel Code, or upon the movement of a State employee of an 8institution or agency subject to the State Universities Civil 9Service System from one such institution or agency to another 10such institution or agency, his or her accrued vacation, 11overtime and sick leave shall be credited to the employee's 12account in accordance with the rules of the jurisdiction to 13which the State employee moved. However, if the rules preclude 14crediting the State employee's total accrued vacation, 15overtime or sick leave to his or her account at the 16jurisdiction to which he or she is to move, the 17nontransferable accrued vacation, overtime, and qualifying 18sick leave shall be payable to the employee in a single lump 19sum payment by the jurisdiction from which he or she moved. 20    (e) Upon the death of a State employee or the retirement, 21indeterminate layoff or resignation of a State employee from 22State service, the employee's retirement or disability 23benefits shall be computed as if the employee had remained in 24the State employment at his or her most recent rate of 25compensation until his or her accumulated unused leave for 26vacation, overtime, sickness and personal business would have   SB1667 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1been exhausted. The employing agency shall certify, in writing 2to the employee, the unused leaves the employee has accrued. 3This certification may be held by the employee or forwarded to 4the retirement fund. Employing agencies not covered by the 5Personnel Code shall certify, in writing to the employee, the 6unused leaves the employee has accrued.7    (f) Accrued sick leave shall be computed by multiplying 81/2 of the number of days of accumulated sick leave by the 9daily rate of compensation applicable to the employee at the 10time of his or her death, retirement, resignation, or other 11termination of service described in this Section.12    The payment for qualifying accrued sick leave after the 13employee's death, retirement, resignation, or other 14termination of service provided by Public Act 83-976 shall be 15for sick leave days earned on or after January 1, 1984 and 16before January 1, 1998. Sick leave accumulated on or after 17January 1, 1998 is not compensable under this Section at the 18time of the employee's death, retirement, resignation, or 19other termination of service, but may be used to establish 20retirement system service credit as provided in the Illinois 21Pension Code.22    The Department of Central Management Services shall 23prescribe by rule the method of computing the accrued sick 24leave days for all employees, including those not otherwise 25subject to its jurisdiction. Beginning January 1, 1998, sick 26leave used by an employee shall be charged against his or her   SB1667 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1accumulated sick leave in the following order: first, sick 2leave accumulated before January 1, 1984; then sick leave 3accumulated on or after January 1, 1998; and finally sick 4leave accumulated on or after January 1, 1984 but before 5January 1, 1998.6(Source: P.A. 93-448, eff. 8-6-03.) 7    Section 5. The Illinois Trust Code is amended by changing 8Sections 809 and 810 as follows: 9    (760 ILCS 3/809)10    Sec. 809. Control and protection of trust property. A 11trustee shall take reasonable steps to take control of and 12protect the trust property, including searching for and, if 13practicable, claiming any unclaimed or presumptively abandoned 14property. If a corporation is acting as co-trustee with one or 15more individuals, the corporate trustee shall have custody of 16the trust estate unless all the trustees otherwise agree.17(Source: P.A. 103-977, eff. 1-1-25.) 18    (760 ILCS 3/810)19    Sec. 810. Recordkeeping and identification of trust 20property. 21    (a) A trustee shall keep adequate records of the 22administration of the trust. 23    (b) A trustee shall keep trust property separate from the   SB1667 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1trustee's own property. 2    (c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), a 3trustee not subject to federal or state banking regulation 4shall cause the trust property to be designated so that the 5interest of the trust, to the extent feasible, appears in 6records maintained by a party other than a trustee or 7beneficiary to whom the trustee has delivered the property. 8    (d) If the trustee maintains records clearly indicating 9the respective interests, a trustee may invest as a whole the 10property of 2 or more separate trusts. 11    (e) A trustee shall maintain or cause to be maintained, 12for a minimum of 7 years after the termination of the trust, a 13copy of the governing trust instrument under which the trustee 14was authorized to act at the time the trust terminated trust 15records for a minimum of 7 years after the dissolution of the 16trust.17    (f) Prior to the termination of the trust destruction of 18trust records, a trustee shall conduct a reasonable search for 19any trust property that is presumptively abandoned or that has 20been reported and remitted to a state unclaimed property 21administrator. 22(Source: P.A. 103-977, eff. 1-1-25.) 23    Section 10. The Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act is 24amended by changing Sections 15-102, 15-203, 15-504, 15-806, 2515-1301, and 15-1302 and by adding Sections 15-214, 15-406,   SB1667 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b115-1002.2, and 15-1303 as follows: 2    (765 ILCS 1026/15-102)3    Sec. 15-102. Definitions. In this Act:4        (1) "Administrator" means the State Treasurer. 5        (2) "Administrator's agent" means a person with which 6    the administrator contracts to conduct an examination 7    under Article 10 on behalf of the administrator. The term 8    includes an independent contractor of the person and each 9    individual participating in the examination on behalf of 10    the person or contractor. 11        (2.5) (Blank).12        (3) "Apparent owner" means a person whose name appears 13    on the records of a holder as the owner of property held, 14    issued, or owing by the holder. 15        (4) "Business association" means a corporation, joint 16    stock company, investment company, unincorporated 17    association, joint venture, limited liability company, 18    business trust, trust company, land bank, safe deposit 19    company, safekeeping depository, financial organization, 20    insurance company, federally chartered entity, utility, 21    sole proprietorship, or other business entity, whether or 22    not for profit.23        (5) "Confidential information" means information that 24    is "personal information" under the Personal Information 25    Protection Act, "private information" under the Freedom of   SB1667 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    Information Act or personal information contained within 2    public records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 3    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 4    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 5    individual subjects of the information as provided in the 6    Freedom of Information Act.7        (6) "Domicile" means:8            (A) for a corporation, the state of its 9        incorporation;10            (B) for a business association whose formation 11        requires a filing with a state, other than a 12        corporation, the state of its filing;13            (C) for a federally chartered entity or an 14        investment company registered under the Investment 15        Company Act of 1940, the state of its home office; and 16            (D) for any other holder, the state of its 17        principal place of business.18        (7) "Electronic" means relating to technology having 19    electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, 20    electromagnetic, or similar capabilities. 21        (8) "Electronic mail" means a communication by 22    electronic means which is automatically retained and 23    stored and may be readily accessed or retrieved. 24        (8.5) "Escheat fee" means any charge imposed solely by 25    virtue of property being reported as presumed abandoned. 26        (9) "Financial organization" means a bank, savings   SB1667 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    bank, foreign bank, corporate fiduciary, currency 2    exchange, money transmitter, or credit union.3        (9.5) "Finder" means (i) a person engaged in the 4    location, recovery, purchase, or assignment of property 5    held by the administrator for a fee, compensation, 6    commission, or other remuneration paid by the owner of the 7    property or (ii) a person engaged in assisting in the 8    location, recovery, purchase, or assignment of property 9    held by the administrator for a fee, compensation, 10    commission, or other remuneration paid by the owner of the 11    property. 12        (10) "Game-related digital content" means digital 13    content that exists only in an electronic game or 14    electronic-game platform. The term:15            (A) includes: 16                (i) game-play currency such as a virtual 17            wallet, even if denominated in United States 18            currency; and19                (ii) the following if for use or redemption 20            only within the game or platform or another 21            electronic game or electronic-game platform: 22                    (I) points sometimes referred to as gems, 23                tokens, gold, and similar names; and 24                    (II) digital codes; and25            (B) does not include an item that the issuer:26                (i) permits to be redeemed for use outside a   SB1667 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1            game or platform for:2                    (I) money; or 3                    (II) goods or services that have more than 4                minimal value; or5                (ii) otherwise monetizes for use outside a 6            game or platform.7        (11) "Gift card" means a record evidencing a promise 8    made for consideration by the seller or issuer of the 9    record that goods, services, or money will be provided to 10    the owner of the record to the value or amount shown in the 11    record that is either:12            (A) a record:13                (i) issued on a prepaid basis primarily for 14            personal, family, or household purposes to a 15            consumer in a specified amount;16                (ii) the value of which does not expire;17                (iii) that is not subject to a dormancy, 18            inactivity, or post-sale service fee;19                (iv) that is redeemable upon presentation for 20            goods or services; and 21                (v) that, unless required by law, may not be 22            redeemed for or converted into money or otherwise 23            monetized by the issuer; or24            (B) a prepaid commercial mobile radio service, as 25        defined in 47 CFR 20.3, as amended.26        (12) "Holder" means a person obligated to hold for the   SB1667 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    account of, or to deliver or pay to, the owner, property 2    subject to this Act.3        (13) "Insurance company" means an association, 4    corporation, or fraternal or mutual-benefit organization, 5    whether or not for profit, engaged in the business of 6    providing life endowments, annuities, or insurance, 7    including accident, burial, casualty, credit-life, 8    contract-performance, dental, disability, fidelity, fire, 9    health, hospitalization, illness, life, malpractice, 10    marine, mortgage, surety, wage-protection, and 11    worker-compensation insurance.12        (14) "Loyalty card" means a record given without 13    direct monetary consideration under an award, reward, 14    benefit, loyalty, incentive, rebate, or promotional 15    program which may be used or redeemed only to obtain goods 16    or services or a discount on goods or services. The term 17    does not include a record that may be redeemed for money or 18    otherwise monetized by the issuer.19        (15) "Mineral" means gas, oil, coal, oil shale, other 20    gaseous liquid or solid hydrocarbon, cement material, sand 21    and gravel, road material, building stone, chemical raw 22    material, gemstone, fissionable and nonfissionable ores, 23    colloidal and other clay, steam and other geothermal 24    resources, and any other substance defined as a mineral by 25    law of this State other than this Act.26        (16) "Mineral proceeds" means an amount payable for   SB1667 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    extraction, production, or sale of minerals, or, on the 2    abandonment of the amount, an amount that becomes payable 3    after abandonment. The term includes an amount payable: 4            (A) for the acquisition and retention of a mineral 5        lease, including a bonus, royalty, compensatory 6        royalty, shut-in royalty, minimum royalty, and delay 7        rental; 8            (B) for the extraction, production, or sale of 9        minerals, including a net revenue interest, royalty, 10        overriding royalty, extraction payment, and production 11        payment; and 12            (C) under an agreement or option, including a 13        joint-operating agreement, unit agreement, pooling 14        agreement, and farm-out agreement. 15        (17) "Money order" means a payment order for a 16    specified amount of money. The term includes an express 17    money order and a personal money order on which the 18    remitter is the purchaser. 19        (18) "Municipal bond" means a bond or evidence of 20    indebtedness issued by a municipality or other political 21    subdivision of a state.22        (19) "Net card value" means the original purchase 23    price or original issued value of a stored-value card, 24    plus amounts added to the original price or value, minus 25    amounts used and any service charge, fee, or dormancy 26    charge permitted by law.  SB1667 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1        (20) "Non-freely transferable security" means a 2    security that cannot be delivered to the administrator by 3    the Depository Trust Clearing Corporation or similar 4    custodian of securities providing post-trade clearing and 5    settlement services to financial markets or cannot be 6    delivered because there is no agent to effect transfer. 7    The term includes a worthless security. 8        (21) "Owner", unless the context otherwise requires, 9    means a person that has a legal, beneficial, or equitable 10    interest in property subject to this Act or the person's 11    legal representative when acting on behalf of the owner. 12    The term includes:13            (A) a depositor, for a deposit; 14            (B) a beneficiary, for a trust other than a 15        deposit in trust; 16            (C) a creditor, claimant, or payee, for other 17        property; and 18            (D) the lawful bearer of a record that may be used 19        to obtain money, a reward, or a thing of value. 20        (22) "Payroll card" means a record that evidences a 21    payroll-card account as defined in Regulation E, 12 CFR 22    Part 1005, as amended.23        (23) "Person" means an individual, estate, business 24    association, public corporation, government or 25    governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or 26    other legal entity, whether or not for profit.   SB1667 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1        (24) "Property" means tangible property described in 2    Section 15-205 15-201 or a fixed and certain interest in 3    intangible property held, issued, or owed in the course of 4    a holder's business or by a government, governmental 5    subdivision, agency, or instrumentality. The term: 6            (A) includes all income from or increments to the 7        property;8            (B) includes property referred to as or evidenced 9        by:10                (i) money, virtual currency, interest, or a 11            dividend, check, draft, deposit, or payroll card; 12                (ii) a credit balance, customer's overpayment, 13            stored-value card, security deposit, refund, 14            credit memorandum, unpaid wage, unused ticket for 15            which the issuer has an obligation to provide a 16            refund, mineral proceeds, or unidentified 17            remittance; 18                (iii) a security except for: 19                    (I) a worthless security; or 20                    (II) a security that is subject to a lien, 21                legal hold, or restriction evidenced on the 22                records of the holder or imposed by operation 23                of law, if the lien, legal hold, or 24                restriction restricts the holder's or owner's 25                ability to receive, transfer, sell, or 26                otherwise negotiate the security;  SB1667 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1                (iv) a bond, debenture, note, or other 2            evidence of indebtedness; 3                (v) money deposited to redeem a security, make 4            a distribution, or pay a dividend; 5                (vi) an amount due and payable under an 6            annuity contract or insurance policy; 7                (vii) an amount distributable from a trust or 8            custodial fund established under a plan to provide 9            health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, 10            retirement, death, stock purchase, profit-sharing, 11            employee-savings, supplemental-unemployment 12            insurance, or a similar benefit; and 13                (viii) any instrument on which a financial 14            organization or business association is directly 15            liable; and 16            (C) does not include:17                (i) game-related digital content;18                (ii) a loyalty card;19                (iii) a gift card; or20                (iv) funds on deposit or held in trust 21            pursuant to Section 16 of the Illinois Pre-Need 22            Cemetery Sales Act.23        (25) "Putative holder" means a person believed by the 24    administrator to be a holder, until the person pays or 25    delivers to the administrator property subject to this Act 26    or the administrator or a court makes a final   SB1667 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    determination that the person is or is not a holder. 2        (26) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a 3    tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or 4    other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. The 5    phrase "records of the holder" includes records maintained 6    by a third party that has contracted with the holder.7        (27) "Security" means: 8            (A) a security as defined in Article 8 of the 9        Uniform Commercial Code;10            (B) a security entitlement as defined in Article 8 11        of the Uniform Commercial Code, including a customer 12        security account held by a registered broker-dealer, 13        to the extent the financial assets held in the 14        security account are not:15                (i) registered on the books of the issuer in 16            the name of the person for which the broker-dealer 17            holds the assets; 18                (ii) payable to the order of the person; or 19                (iii) specifically indorsed to the person; or 20            (C) an equity interest in a business association 21        not included in subparagraph (A) or (B).22        (28) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate 23    or adopt a record:24            (A) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or 25            (B) to attach to or logically associate with the 26        record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.  SB1667 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1        (29) "State" means a state of the United States, the 2    District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the 3    United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular 4    possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United 5    States.6        (30) "Stored-value card" means a card, code, or other 7    device that is:8            (A) issued on a prepaid basis primarily for 9        personal, family, or household purposes to a consumer 10        in a specified amount, whether or not that amount may 11        be increased or reloaded in exchange for payment; and 12            (B) redeemable upon presentation at multiple 13        unaffiliated merchants for goods or services or usable 14        at automated teller machines; and 15        "Stored-value card" does not include a gift card, 16    payroll card, loyalty card, or game-related digital 17    content.18        (31) "Utility" means a person that owns or operates 19    for public use a plant, equipment, real property, 20    franchise, or license for the following public services:21            (A) transmission of communications or information;22            (B) production, storage, transmission, sale, 23        delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam, 24        or gas; or 25            (C) provision of sewage or septic services, or 26        trash, garbage, or recycling disposal.  SB1667 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1        (32) "Virtual currency" means any type of digital 2    unit, including cryptocurrency, used as a medium of 3    exchange, unit of account, or a form of digitally stored 4    value, which does not have legal tender status recognized 5    by the United States. The term does not include:6            (A) the software or protocols governing the 7        transfer of the digital representation of value; 8            (B) game-related digital content; or9            (C) a loyalty card or gift card.10        (33) "Worthless security" means a security whose cost 11    of liquidation and delivery to the administrator would 12    exceed the value of the security on the date a report is 13    due under this Act.14(Source: P.A. 101-552, eff. 1-1-20; 102-288, eff. 8-6-21.) 15    (765 ILCS 1026/15-203)16    Sec. 15-203. When other tax-deferred account presumed 17abandoned.18    (a) Subject to Section 15-210 and except for property 19described in Section 15-202, property held in an account or 20plan, including a health savings account, that qualifies for 21tax deferral under the income-tax laws of the United States is 22presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner 3 23years after the earlier of:24        (1) the date, if determinable by the holder, specified 25    in the income-tax laws and regulations of the United   SB1667 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    States by which distribution of the property must begin to 2    avoid a tax penalty, with no distribution having been 3    made; or 4        (2) 20 30 years after the date the account was opened.5    (b) If the owner is deceased, then property subject to 6this Section is presumed abandoned 2 years from the earliest 7of:8        (1) the date of the distribution or attempted 9    distribution of the property;10        (2) the date of the required distribution as stated in 11    the plan or trust agreement governing the plan; or 12        (3) the date, if determinable by the holder, specified 13    in the income tax laws of the United States by which 14    distribution of the property must begin in order to avoid 15    a tax penalty.16    (c) In the tenth year after the opening of an account 17holding property covered by this Section in which the apparent 18owner has not, within the previous 3 years, indicated an 19interest under Section 15-210 and that is not otherwise 20presumed abandoned, the holder shall attempt to contact the 21apparent owner of the account in a manner substantially 22similar to the manner in which notice is provided under 23Section 15-501. The administrator shall adopt rules to 24implement this subsection. 25(Source: P.A. 100-22, eff. 1-1-18.)   SB1667 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    (765 ILCS 1026/15-214 new)2    Sec. 15-214. Funds owed to deceased state employees. After 3the death of an employee of a State agency, as defined in 4Section 1-7 of the Illinois State Auditing Act, any 5outstanding funds owed to the deceased employee shall be paid 6to the heirs of the deceased employee or the deceased 7employee's estate within one year of the employee's death in 8accordance with Section 14a of the State Finance Act. Upon 9expiration of the one year period, any funds remaining unpaid 10shall be reported and remitted to the administrator within 90 11days. The administrator shall promptly provide notice to the 12employee's last known address under Section 15-503 of this 13Act. 14    (765 ILCS 1026/15-406 new)15    Sec. 15-406. Presumptively abandoned property held in 16trust. A holder who holds property presumed abandoned under 17this Act holds the property in trust for the benefit of the 18administrator on behalf of the owner from and after the date 19the property is presumed abandoned under this Act. A holder 20shall establish trust accounts or otherwise segregate property 21held for the benefit of the administrator under this Section 22pending delivery in accordance with Section 15-603, provided 23that any failure to establish trust accounts or otherwise 24segregate the property shall not affect the owner's interest 25in the property or the obligation of the holder to report and   SB1667 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1remit the property. This Section does not apply to property 2held by an insurance company as defined in this Act or property 3insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, National 4Credit Union Administration, or other insurer of accounts 5approved by a depository institution's primary financial 6regulatory agency. 7    (765 ILCS 1026/15-504)8    Sec. 15-504. Cooperation among State officers and agencies 9to locate apparent owner. 10    (a) Unless prohibited by law of this State other than this 11Act, on request of the administrator, each officer, agency, 12board, commission, division, and department of this State, any 13body politic and corporate created by this State for a public 14purpose, and each political subdivision of this State shall 15make its books and records available to the administrator and 16cooperate with the administrator to determine the current 17address of an apparent owner of property held by the 18administrator under this Act or to otherwise assist the 19administrator in the administration of this Act. The 20administrator may also enter into data sharing agreements to 21enable such other governmental agencies to provide an 22additional notice to apparent owners of property held by the 23administrator.24    (b) If the administrator reasonably believes that the 25apparent owner of property presumed abandoned held by the   SB1667 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1administrator under this Act is a unit of local government in 2this State which files an audit report or annual financial 3report with the Comptroller, the administrator may give 4written notice to the person or persons identified in the most 5recent annual financial report as the contact person, the 6chief executive officer, and the chief financial officer.7    (c) If the administrator reasonably believes that the 8apparent owner of property presumed abandoned held by the 9administrator under this Act is a State agency as defined in 10the Illinois State Auditing Act, the administrator may give 11written notice to the person whom the records of the 12Comptroller indicate are the chief executive officer and chief 13fiscal officer of such State agency and the Governor's Office 14of Management and Budget. 15(Source: P.A. 103-148, eff. 6-30-23.) 16    (765 ILCS 1026/15-806)17    Sec. 15-806. Escheat of certain abandoned State agency 18moneys. Property presumed abandoned where the administrator 19reasonably believes the owner is a State agency as defined in 20the Illinois State Auditing Act, shall escheat to the State 21and shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund if all of 22the following apply:23        (1) the administrator has provided written notice to 24    the State agency and the Governor's Office of Management 25    and Budget pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 15-504 at   SB1667 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    least 3 times in at least 3 different calendar years;2        (2) it has been more than 1 year 3 years since the 3    administrator first provided written notice to the State 4    agency pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 15-504; and5        (3) the State agency has not initiated a claim or 6    otherwise expressed an indication of interest in the 7    property; and 8        (4) the administrator provides written notice of the 9    escheat to the Director of the Governor's Office of 10    Management and Budget.11(Source: P.A. 103-148, eff. 6-30-23.) 12    (765 ILCS 1026/15-1002.2 new)13    Sec. 15-1002.2. Additional authority for the Secretary of 14Financial and Professional Regulation.15    (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Secretary 16of Financial and Professional Regulation may order any 17regulated person to immediately report and remit property 18subject to this Act, in whole or in part, to the administrator 19when the Secretary deems, in the Secretary's sole discretion, 20such reporting and remittance to be necessary to protect the 21interest of owners.22    (b) Any order issued by the Secretary under this Section 23shall accelerate the dormancy period otherwise set forth in 24this Act.25    (c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a regulated   SB1667 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1person may accelerate the dormancy period otherwise set forth 2in this Act and immediately report and remit property subject 3to this Act, in whole or in part, with written permission from 4the Secretary of Financial and Professional Regulation, 5subject to any terms and conditions that the Secretary deems, 6in the Secretary's sole discretion, to be necessary to protect 7the interest of owners.8    (d) The Secretary of Financial and Professional Regulation 9may adopt rules consistent with the purposes of this Section 10necessary to administer, implement, interpret, and enforce 11this Section.12    (e) The administrator is authorized and empowered to adopt 13rules consistent with the purposes of this Section, including, 14but not limited to, rules necessary to administer, implement, 15interpret, and enforce this Section.16    (f) For purposes of this Section, "regulated person" means 17any person or entity who is certified, permitted, approved, 18chartered, registered, licensed, or otherwise authorized to 19engage in any profession, trade, occupation, or industry by 20the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation's 21Division of Banking or Division of Financial Institutions 22under any Act or rule administered by the Division of Banking 23or Division of Financial Institutions. Notwithstanding the 24foregoing, banks, savings banks, and credit unions organized 25under the laws of this State are not subject to this Section.    SB1667 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    (765 ILCS 1026/15-1301)2    Sec. 15-1301. When agreement to locate property 3enforceable. 4    (a) An agreement by an owner or an apparent owner and a 5finder another person, the primary purpose of which is to 6locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the location, delivery, 7or recovery of property held by the administrator for a fee, 8compensation, commission, or other remuneration, is 9enforceable only if the agreement:10        (1) is in a record that clearly states the nature of 11    the property and the services to be provided;12        (2) is signed by or on behalf of the owner or apparent 13    owner; and14        (3) states the amount or value of the property 15    reasonably expected to be recovered, computed before and 16    after a fee, or other compensation, commission, or other 17    remuneration to be paid to the finder person has been 18    deducted; .19        (4) clearly states that the property is in the 20    possession of the administrator and may be recovered from 21    the administrator without paying a fee; and22        (5) provides the contact information for recovering 23    the property from the administrator.24    (b) In conjunction with the filing of any claim involving 25an agreement by an owner or apparent owner and a finder, the 26administrator shall receive from the claimant a full and   SB1667 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1unredacted copy of the agreement signed by the owner or 2apparent owner and the finder.3    (c) A finder may receive payment directly from the 4administrator only if the claimant provides a fully executed 5and unredacted copy of the agreement together with the claim 6and if the agreement provides for the direct payment to the 7finder. In all other cases, the administrator must remit the 8entirety of the payment to the claimant. All payments remain 9subject to offset as provided in Section 15-905. 10(Source: P.A. 100-22, eff. 1-1-18.) 11    (765 ILCS 1026/15-1302)12    Sec. 15-1302. When agreement to locate property void. 13    (a) Time period. Subject to subsection (b), an agreement 14under Section 15-1301 is void if it is entered into during the 15period beginning on the date the property was presumed 16abandoned under this Act and ending 24 months after the 17payment or delivery of the property to the administrator.18    (b) Prohibition on future assignments. If a provision in 19an agreement described in Section 15-1301 applies to an 20obligation that did not exist or was not owed to the assignor 21at the time of execution of the agreement mineral proceeds for 22which compensation is to be paid to the other person based in 23whole or in part on a part of the underlying minerals or 24mineral proceeds not then presumed abandoned, the provision is 25void regardless of when the agreement was entered into.  SB1667 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    (c) Limit on fees. An agreement under this Article 13 that 2which provides for a fee, compensation, commission, or other 3remuneration in an amount that is more than 10% of the amount 4collected is unenforceable except by the apparent owner. The 5purchase, assignment, or other conveyance of unclaimed 6property to a finder, resulting in a net fee, compensation, 7commission, remuneration, or other profit to the finder in 8excess of 10% of the amount collected is prohibited. 9    (d) Other grounds for being void. An apparent owner or the 10administrator may assert that an agreement described in this 11Article 13 is void on a ground other than it provides for 12payment of unconscionable compensation in excess of the amount 13authorized by paragraph (c) of this Section.14    (e) License required. On or after January 1, 2026, a A 15person attempting or seeking to act as a finder must be 16licensed as a finder by the administrator pursuant to Section 1715-1503 collect a contingent fee for discovering, on behalf of 18an apparent owner, presumptively abandoned property must be 19licensed as a private detective pursuant to the Private 20Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 21Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004.22    (f) Attorneys. This Section does not apply to an agreement 23between an owner and an attorney to pursue a claim for recovery 24of specifically identified property held by the administrator 25or to contest the administrator's denial of a claim for 26recovery of the property where the attorney has an   SB1667 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1attorney-client relationship with the owner.2    (g) CPA firms. This Section does not apply to an apparent 3owner's agreement with a CPA firm licensed under the Illinois 4Public Accounting Act, or with an affiliate of such firm, if 5all of the following apply:6        (1) the CPA firm has registered with the administrator 7    and is in good standing with the Illinois Department of 8    Financial and Professional Regulation;9        (2) the apparent owner is not a natural person; and10        (3) the CPA firm, or with an affiliate of such firm, 11    also provides the apparent owner professional services to 12    assist with the apparent owner's compliance with the 13    reporting requirements of this Act. The administrator 14    shall adopt rules to implement and administer the 15    registration of CPA firms and the claims process under 16    this paragraph (g). 17    (h) Enforcement. The administrator may use all the powers 18under Section 15-1002 to determine compliance with this 19Article. 20(Source: P.A. 103-977, eff. 1-1-25.) 21    (765 ILCS 1026/15-1303 new)22    Sec. 15-1303. License to act as finder.23    (a) License required. No person shall, without a valid 24license issued by the administrator, (i) represent or present 25to the public in any manner to be a finder in the State of   SB1667 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1Illinois or (ii) act as a finder.2    (b) Qualification for licensure. An applicant is qualified 3for licensure as a finder if the applicant meets all the 4following qualifications:5        (1) If the applicant is a natural person, the person 6    is at least 21 years of age.7        (2) The applicant is of good moral character. When 8    determining the moral character of an applicant, the 9    administrator shall take into consideration the following:10            (A) Whether the applicant has engaged in any 11        unethical or dishonest business practices.12            (B) Whether the applicant has been adjudicated, 13        civilly or criminally, to have committed fraud or to 14        have violated any law of any state involving unfair 15        trade or business practices, has been convicted of a 16        misdemeanor of which fraud is an essential element or 17        which involves any aspect of the finder business or 18        claiming or reporting of unclaimed property, or has 19        been convicted of any felony.20            (C) Whether the applicant has intentionally 21        violated any provision of this Act or a predecessor 22        law or any regulations relating thereto.23            (D) Whether the applicant has been permanently or 24        temporarily suspended, enjoined, or barred by any 25        government agency or court of competent jurisdiction 26        in any state from engaging in or continuing any   SB1667 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1        conduct or practice involving any aspect of the finder 2        business, the claiming or reporting of unclaimed 3        property, or any other regulated business or 4        occupation.5            (E) Whether any charges or complaints lodged 6        against the applicant for which fraud, deceptive 7        business practices, or similar offenses involving 8        moral turpitude were an essential element that 9        resulted in civil or criminal litigation or 10        administrative proceedings.11            (F) Whether the applicant has made any 12        misrepresentations or false statements or concealed 13        any material fact.14        (3) If the applicant is a corporation, limited 15    liability company, partnership, or other entity permitted 16    by law, then the administrator shall take into 17    consideration each principal, owner, member, officer, and 18    shareholder holding 25% or more of corporate stock for 19    compliance with subsection (b) of this Section.20        (4) The applicant demonstrates knowledge and 21    understanding of this Act, including, but not limited to, 22    the provisions of Article 13 of this Act.23    (c) Application for license. Every person seeking to be 24licensed as a finder shall apply to the administrator in 25writing on forms or electronically as prescribed by the 26administrator.  SB1667 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1        (1) Every application shall be accompanied by a fee 2    that the administrator shall establish by rule. The fee 3    may not be refundable.4        (2) All applicants shall provide a valid mailing 5    address and email address to the administrator, which 6    shall serve as the address of record and email address of 7    record, respectively, at the time of application for 8    licensure or renewal of a license, and shall inform the 9    administrator in writing of any change in address of 10    record or email address of record within 14 days after the 11    change.12        (3) The applicant shall authorize the administrator to 13    conduct a criminal background check to determine if the 14    applicant has ever been charged with a crime and, if so, 15    the disposition of those charges. If the applicant is a 16    corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or 17    other entity permitted by law, then the authorization 18    shall include each principal, owner, member, officer, and 19    shareholder holding 10% or more of corporate stock, as 20    applicable. The administrator shall charge a fee for 21    conducting the criminal background check that shall not 22    exceed the actual cost of the criminal background check.23        (4) The applicant shall provide all information that, 24    in the judgment of the administrator, enables the 25    administrator to pass on the qualifications of the 26    applicant for licensure as a finder under this Act. The   SB1667 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    administrator shall establish the minimum information 2    required to be provided by administrative rule, but is 3    authorized to request additional information when, in the 4    judgment of the administrator, such information is 5    necessary.6        (5) In addition to any other information required to 7    be provided in the application, the applicant shall 8    provide the applicant's Social Security Number, Individual 9    Taxpayer Identification Number, or Federal Employer 10    Identification Number. If the applicant is a corporation, 11    limited liability company, partnership, or other entity 12    permitted by law, then the applicant shall provide the 13    Social Security Number or Individual Taxpayer 14    Identification Number for each principal, owner, member, 15    officer, and shareholder holding 10% or more of corporate 16    stock, as applicable.17    (d) Fidelity bond. Applications for licensure shall also 18be accompanied by a fidelity bond issued by a bonding company 19or insurance company authorized to do business in this State, 20as approved by the administrator, in an amount established by 21the administrator by rule not to exceed $100,000. This bond 22runs to the benefit of the administrator and the 23administrator's successor for the benefit of the Unclaimed 24Property Trust Fund.25    (e) Renewal of license.26        (1) The expiration date and renewal period for each   SB1667 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    license issued under this Section shall be set by rule.2        (2) The holder of a license issued under this Section 3    may renew the license within 90 days preceding the 4    expiration date by (A) completing and submitting to the 5    administrator a renewal application in the manner 6    prescribed by the administrator and (B) paying the 7    required fees, which shall be established by the 8    administrator by administrative rule.9    (f) Any application for licensure or for renewal not acted 10upon within 90 days may be deemed denied.11    (g) The administrator may refuse to issue or may suspend 12or revoke a license on any of the following grounds:13        (1) The applicant or licensee has made any 14    misrepresentations or false statements or concealed any 15    material fact.16        (2) The applicant or licensee is insolvent.17        (3) The applicant or licensee has conducted or is 18    about to engage in dishonorable, unethical, or 19    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 20    defraud, or harm the public.21        (4) The applicant or licensee has failed to satisfy 22    any enforceable judgment or decree rendered by any court 23    of competent jurisdiction against the applicant or 24    licensee.25        (5) The applicant or licensee fails to make a 26    substantive response to a request for information by the   SB1667 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    administrator within 30 days of the request.2        (6) The applicant or licensee, including any member, 3    officer, or director thereof if the applicant or licensee 4    is a firm, partnership, association, or corporation or any 5    shareholder holding more than 10% of the corporate stock, 6    has violated any provision of this Act or any rule adopted 7    under this Act or a valid order entered by the 8    administrator under this Act.9        (7) The applicant or licensee aided or assisted 10    another person in violating any provision of this Act or 11    rules adopted under this Act.12        (8) The applicant or licensee engaged in solicitation 13    of professional services by using false or misleading 14    advertising.15        (9) The administrator finds any fact or condition 16    existing which, if it had existed at the time of the 17    original application for the license, would have warranted 18    the administrator in refusing the issuance of the license.19    (h) Denial, suspension, or revocation of license.20        (1) If the administrator determines that an 21    application for licensure or for renewal of a license 22    should be denied, then the applicant shall be sent a 23    notice of intent to deny and the applicant shall be given 24    the opportunity to request, within 20 days of the notice, 25    a hearing on the denial.26        (2) If the administrator determines that a license   SB1667 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    should be suspended or revoked, then the licensee shall be 2    sent a notice of intent to suspend or revoke the license 3    and the licensee shall be given the opportunity to 4    request, within 20 days of the notice, a hearing on the 5    suspension or revocation.6        (3) Any hearing on the denial, suspension, or 7    revocation shall be conducted in accordance with the State 8    Treasurer's administrative rules concerning rules of 9    practice in administrative hearings.10    (i) Practice without license; injunction; cease and desist 11order; civil penalties.12        (1) Acting as a finder by any person who has not been 13    issued a license by the administrator, whose license has 14    been suspended or revoked, or whose license has not been 15    renewed, is hereby declared to be inimical to the public 16    welfare and to constitute a public nuisance.17        (2) The administrator may, in the name of the People 18    of the State of Illinois through the Attorney General, 19    apply for an injunction in the circuit court to enjoin any 20    person who has not been issued a license or whose license 21    has been suspended or revoked, or whose license has not 22    been renewed, from acting as a finder. Upon the filing of a 23    verified complaint in court, the court, if satisfied by 24    affidavit or otherwise that the person is or has been 25    acting as a finder without having been issued a license or 26    after the person's license has been suspended, revoked, or   SB1667 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    not renewed, may issue a temporary restraining order or 2    preliminary injunction, without notice or bond, enjoining 3    the defendant from further acting as a finder. A copy of 4    the verified complaint shall be served upon the defendant 5    and the proceedings shall thereafter be conducted as in 6    other civil cases. If it is established that the defendant 7    has been or is acting as a finder without having been 8    issued a license or has been or is acting as a finder after 9    his or her license has been suspended, revoked, or not 10    renewed, the court may enter a judgment perpetually 11    enjoining the defendant from further acting as a finder. 12    In case of violation of any injunction entered under this 13    Section, the court may summarily try and punish the 14    offender for contempt of court. Any injunction proceeding 15    shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, all penalties 16    and other remedies in this Act.17        (3) Whenever, in the opinion of the administrator, any 18    person or other entity violates any provision of this 19    Article, the administrator may issue a notice to show 20    cause why an order to cease and desist should not be 21    entered against that person or other entity. The rule 22    shall clearly set forth the grounds relied upon by the 23    administrator and shall provide a period of at least 7 24    days from the date of the rule to file an answer to the 25    satisfaction of the administrator. Failure to answer to 26    the satisfaction of the administrator shall cause an order   SB1667 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1    to cease and desist to be issued immediately.2        (4) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, 3    any person that violates any provision of this Article 4    shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty in an amount 5    determined by the administrator not to exceed $10,000 for 6    each violation. The penalty shall be assessed in 7    proceedings as provided in the State Treasurer's 8    administrative rules concerning rules of practice in 9    administrative hearings.10    (j) Confidentiality. All information collected by the 11administrator in the course of an examination or investigation 12of a licensee or applicant, including, but not limited to, any 13complaint against a licensee filed with the administrator and 14information collected to investigate any such complaint, shall 15be maintained for the confidential use of the administrator 16and shall not be disclosed, except that the administrator may 17disclose such information to law enforcement officials, other 18government agencies including the unclaimed property programs 19of other states that have an appropriate regulatory interest 20as determined by the administrator, or a party presenting a 21lawful subpoena to the administrator. Information and 22documents disclosed to a federal, State, county, or local law 23enforcement agency shall not be disclosed by the agency for 24any purpose to any other agency or person. A formal complaint 25filed against a licensee by the administrator, or any order 26issued by the administrator against a licensee or applicant,   SB1667 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 10835 JRC 20916 b1shall be a public record, except as otherwise prohibited by 2law.3    (k) All moneys received by the administrator under this 4Article shall be deposited into the State Treasurer's 5Administrative Fund. 6    (l) This Section applies on and after January 1, 2026.